Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB474.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 227.200 TO 227.400 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, as of December 31, 2026, all existing
single-family dwellings and multifamily residential units shall have at least one
(1) working hardwired or ten (10) year lithium battery-powered smoke detector
inside each dwelling or unit.
(2) Any required smoke detector shall be installed in each single-family dwelling or
multifamily residential unit prior to the sale, lease, change of ownership, or
change in tenancy of the dwelling or unit.
(3) It shall be the responsibility of the property owner, seller, or lessor to test and
provide a working smoke detector in a single-family dwelling or multifamily
residential unit. The seller or lessor shall attest to the presence and functioning of
the required smoke detector by providing a signed affidavit to the:
(a) Purchaser at the real estate closing; or
(b) Lessee prior to the tenancy of the property.
(4) An individual licensed under KRS Chapter 324 shall not be liable for the actions
or inactions of a property owner or seller under this section.
(5) The state fire marshal shall publish information and recommendations on the
installation of carbon monoxide detectors and fuel and gas leak detectors in
single-family dwellings and multifamily residential units that use:
(a) Gas or liquid fuel-fired appliances or heating equipment; or
(b) Coal-burning or wood-burning stoves.
(6) (a) The local fire chief or highest ranking fire department officer of each local
government shall promptly notify the state fire marshal upon becoming
aware of a fire-related injury or fatality or carbon monoxide-related injury
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 10/21/2025 8:17 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 498
or fatality.
(b) The state fire marshal shall submit an annual report to the Kentucky Fire
Commission on the number of fire-related injuries and fatalities and carbon
monoxide-related injuries and fatalities in the Commonwealth based on the
information received under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 10/21/2025 8:17 AM Jacketed